Illinois, session 104th, HB65.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Remedy 5to Remove Unauthorized Persons from Residential Real Estate 6Act. 7    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that the 8right to exclude others from entering and the right to direct 9others to immediately vacate residential real property are the 10most important real property rights. The General Assembly 11further finds that existing remedies regarding unauthorized 12persons who unlawfully remain on residential real property 13fail to adequately protect the rights of the property owner 14and fail to adequately discourage theft and vandalism. The 15intent of this Act is to quickly restore possession of 16residential real property to the lawful owner of the property 17when the property is being unlawfully occupied and to preserve 18property rights while limiting the opportunity for criminal 19activity. 20    Section 10. Conditions of removal and statutory form. 21    (a) A property owner or authorized agent may request a law 22enforcement officer to remove a person or persons unlawfully   HB0065- 2 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1occupying a residential dwelling under this Act if all of the 2following conditions are met: 3        (1) The requesting person is the property owner or 4    authorized agent of the property owner. 5        (2) The real property that is being occupied includes 6    a residential dwelling. 7        (3) An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully 8    entered and remain or continue to reside on the property 9    owner's property. 10        (4) The real property was not open to members of the 11    public at the time the unauthorized person or persons 12    entered. 13        (5) The property owner has directed the unauthorized 14    person to leave the property. 15        (6) The unauthorized person or persons are not current 16    or former tenants under a written or oral rental agreement 17    authorized by the property owner. 18        (7) The unauthorized person or persons are not 19    immediate family members of the property owner. 20        (8) There is no pending litigation related to the real 21    property between the property owner and any known 22    unauthorized person. 23    (b) To request the removal of an unlawful occupant of a 24residential dwelling, the property owner or authorized agent 25must submit a complaint by presenting a completed and verified 26Complaint to Remove Persons Unlawfully Occupying Residential   HB0065- 3 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1Real Property to a law enforcement officer. The submitted 2complaint must be in substantially the following form:  3COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY OCCUPYING4RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY5    I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real 6property located at ... ..., declare under the penalty of 7perjury that (initial each box): 8        1. .... I am the owner of the real property or the 9    authorized agent of the owner of the real property. 10        2. .... I purchased the property on ..... 11        3. .... The real property is a residential dwelling. 12        4. .... An unauthorized person or persons have 13    unlawfully entered and are remaining or residing 14    unlawfully on the real property. 15        5. .... The real property was not open to members of 16    the public at the time the unauthorized person or persons 17    entered. 18        6. .... I have directed the unauthorized person or 19    persons to leave the real property, but they have not done 20    so. 21        7. .... The person or persons are not current or 22    former tenants under any valid lease authorized by the 23    property owner, and any lease that may be produced by an 24    occupant is fraudulent. 25        8. .... The unauthorized person or persons sought to   HB0065- 4 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1    be removed are not an owner or a co-owner of the property 2    and have not been listed on the title to the property 3    unless the person or persons have engaged in title fraud. 4        9. .... The unauthorized person or persons are not 5    immediate family members of the property owner. 6        10. .... There is no litigation related to the real 7    property pending between the property owner and any person 8    sought to be removed. 9        11. .... I understand that a person or persons removed 10    from the property under this procedure may bring an action 11    against me for any false statements made in this complaint 12    or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a 13    result of such action I may be held liable for actual 14    damages, penalties, costs, and reasonable attorney's fees. 15        12. .... I am requesting the law enforcement officer 16    to remove the unauthorized person or persons from the 17    residential property. 18        13. .... A copy of my valid government-issued 19    identification is attached, or I am an agent of the 20    property owner, and documents evidencing my authority to 21    act on the property owner's behalf are attached. 22    I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS COMPLAINT AND 23EACH STATEMENT IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE 24STATEMENTS MADE IN THIS COMPLAINT ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTY 25OF PERJURY.26     ...(Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Owner)   HB0065- 5 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1    Section 15. Law enforcement officer's duties and fees. 2    (a) Upon receipt of the complaint, the law enforcement 3officer shall verify that the person submitting the complaint 4is the record owner of the real property or the authorized 5agent of the owner and appears otherwise entitled to relief 6under this Act. If verified, the law enforcement officer 7shall, without delay, serve a notice to vacate on all the 8unlawful occupants and shall put the owner in possession of 9the real property. Service may be accomplished by hand 10delivery of the notice to an occupant or by posting the notice 11on the front door or entrance of the dwelling. The law 12enforcement officer shall also attempt to verify the 13identities of all persons occupying the dwelling and note the 14identities on the return of service. 15    (b) The law enforcement officer is entitled to the same 16fee for service of the notice to vacate as if the law 17enforcement officer were serving an eviction order under 18Article IX of the Code of Civil Procedure. After the law 19enforcement officer serves the notice to vacate and after the 203-day waiting period described in Section 20, the property 21owner or authorized agent may request that the law enforcement 22officer stand by to keep the peace while the property owner or 23agent of the owner changes the locks and removes the personal 24property of the unlawful occupants from the premises to or 25near the property line. When such a request is made, the law   HB0065- 6 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1enforcement officer may charge a reasonable hourly rate to the 2person requesting the law enforcement officer's services. The 3law enforcement officer is not liable to the unlawful occupant 4or any other party for loss, destruction, or damage of 5property. The property owner or his or her authorized agent is 6not liable to an unlawful occupant or any other party for the 7loss, destruction, or damage to the personal property unless 8the removal was wrongful. 9    Section 20. Time limit to vacate after notice. Any person 10who receives a notice to vacate from a law enforcement officer 11under Section 15 shall vacate the real property within 3 12business days of receiving the notice. If any person fails to 13vacate the real property within 3 business days of receiving 14such notice, the law enforcement officer shall remove such 15person. If appropriate, the law enforcement officer may arrest 16any person found in the dwelling for trespass, outstanding 17warrants, or any other legal cause.  18    Section 25. Action for wrongful removal; counter 19affidavit. 20    (a) A person may bring a civil action for wrongful removal 21under this Act by filing a complaint that is accompanied by an 22affidavit which establishes that the person was wrongfully 23removed. A person harmed by a wrongful removal under this Act 24may be restored to possession of the real property and may   HB0065- 7 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1recover actual costs and damages incurred, statutory damages 2equal to triple the fair market rent of the dwelling, court 3costs, and reasonable attorney's fees. The court is requested 4to give such an action priority on its calendar. This Act does 5not limit the rights of a property owner or limit the authority 6of a law enforcement officer to arrest an unlawful occupant 7for trespassing, vandalism, theft, or other crimes.8    (b) The property owner who submitted the complaint to have 9the person removed may file an answer contesting the claims of 10the person bringing an action under subsection (a). The court, 11upon review of both affidavits, shall make a finding of who is 12the most likely and true lawful possessor of the real 13property. 14    Section 90. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 15Sections 17-5.8 and 21-3.1 as follows: 16    (720 ILCS 5/17-5.8 new)17    Sec. 17-5.8. Unlawful listing or advertising of 18residential real property. A person who lists or advertises 19residential real property for sale knowing that the purported 20seller has no legal title or authority to sell the property, or 21rents or leases the property to another person knowing that he 22or she has no lawful ownership in the property or leasehold 23interest in the property, commits a Class 4 felony.   HB0065- 8 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1    (720 ILCS 5/21-3.1 new)2    Sec. 21-3.1. Unlawful squatting. 3    (a) A person commits unlawful squatting when he or she 4enters upon the land or premises of another and resides on such 5land or premises for any period of time knowingly acting 6without the knowledge or consent of the owner, rightful 7occupant, or an authorized representative of the owner. For 8the purposes of this Section, "resides" means to inhabit or 9live on or within any land or premises.10    (b) Any person who commits or is accused of committing 11unlawful squatting shall receive a citation advising him or 12her that he or she must present to the issuing law enforcement 13agency, within 3 business days of receipt of the citation, 14properly executed documentation, including a properly executed 15lease or rental agreement or proof of rental payments, that 16authorizes the person's entry on such land or premises or 17submit proof that the person has obtained adverse possession 18of the land or premises under Section 13-101, 13-107, 1913-107.1, 13-109, or 13-109.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 20If the person is unable to provide the documentation or proof 21required under this subsection, he or she shall be subject to 22arrest for unlawful squatting. If the person is able to 23provide the documentation or proof required under this 24subsection, a hearing shall be set within 7 days of submission 25of such documentation and if the court finds that the 26submitted documentation was not properly executed or is not   HB0065- 9 -LRB104 02915 LNS 12931 b1meritorious, he or she shall be subject to demand for 2possession, removal, and arrest, and, upon conviction, shall 3be assessed an additional fine based on the fair market 4monthly rental rate of the land or premises.5    (c) Sentence. A violation of this Section is a Class A 6misdemeanor.